Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4374.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9q. For taxes levied after December 31, 2025, the following property is exempt from the tax levied under the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.901 to 211.906, as provided in section 3 of the state education tax act, 1993 PA 331, MCL 211.903: (a) Property classified as residential real property under section 34c. (b) Property exempt as qualified agricultural property from the tax levied by a local school district for school operating purposes under section 7ee, on which is located a single-family dwelling owned and occupied by an owner who is actively involved in the agricultural use of the property and who has not claimed a principal residence exemption on other property under section 7cc. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4373 (request no. H01184'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.